Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.115

Technical advisory group—International building code.

(1) The state building code council shall convene a technical advisory group for the purpose of recommending modifications and limitations to the international building code that would allow for a single exit stairway to serve multifamily residential structures up to six stories above grade plane. The recommendations must include considerations for adequate and available water supply, the presence and response time of a professional fire department, and any other provisions necessary to ensure public health, safety, and general welfare.

(2) The technical advisory group shall provide its recommendations to the council in time for the council to adopt or amend rules or codes as necessary for implementation in the 2024 international building code. The council shall take action to adopt additions and amendments to rules or codes as necessary by July 1, 2026.

[ 2023 c 372 s 1.]